Utah statutes.
52-8-102.    Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Attribution" means to be responsible for the truth, correctness, and
accuracy of a report.
(2)  "Chief executive officer" means:
(a)  the governor, for the state;
(b)  the chair of the county commission or the county executive, for a county;
and
(c)  the mayor, for a municipality, or if governed under a council-manager
form of government, the chair of the council.
(3)  "Government entity" includes the state, its agencies and institutions,
each county, municipality, school district, local district, and special
service district in Utah.
(4)  "Promotional literature" means reports whose primary or secondary purpose
is to provide nonresidents with information about the government entity that
produced the report.
(5) (a)  "Report" means each account, statement, record of proceedings,
summary of activities, and other written or printed document required by
statute that is prepared or produced by a government entity that is
distributed to the public.
(b)  "Report" does not mean written or printed documents whose primary purpose
is to provide biographical information about government officials.
